Arkansas, session 2025, HB1754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 11 is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Private Property Protection Act

18-11-901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Private
Property Protection Act".

18-11-902. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The General Assembly has the highest interest in vindicating
and protecting private property rights; and
(2) The constitutional right to acquire, possess, and protect
property under Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, § 2, also embodies the
notion of the fundamental right to use property, including the use of
*ZRC082*
03/12/2025 12:59:56 PM ZRC082

HB1754
property for financial gain or benefit.
(b) The General Assembly intends for this subchapter to ensure that
property use restrictions are limited to those demonstrably necessary and
narrowly tailored to fulfill a compelling governmental interest.

18-11-903. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Compelling governmental interest" means a governmental
interest of the highest order;
(2) "Governmental entity" means a unit of state or local
government, including without limitation:
(A) A state agency;
(B) A county;
(C) A municipality; or
(D) Other political subdivision of the state;
(3) "Nuisance" means anything that:
(A) Is injurious to health, indecent or offensive to the
senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property so as to interfere with
the comfortable enjoyment of life or property; or
(B) Unlawfully obstructs the free passage or use in the
customary manner of a navigable lake, river, bay, stream, canal, or basin or
any public park, square, street, or highway;
(4) "Private property" means the following that are owned by a
private person or private entity:
(A) Land;
(B) Property that is affixed to land, including without
limitation a manufactured home declared an improvement to real property;
(C) Property that is incidental or appurtenant to land; or
(D) Property that is immovable by law; and
(5) "Property use restriction" means a law, ordinance,
resolution, regulation, rule, policy, condition, test, permit, or other
administrative action enacted by a governmental entity on or after the
effective date of this act that restricts the use and enjoyment of private
property by the property owner or other person in lawful possession of the
private property.

03/12/2025 12:59:56 PM ZRC082

HB1754
18-11-904. Limitations on property use restrictions — Exceptions.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a property
use restriction related to a planning board, the planning or zoning of
property, local regulation of a subdivision, or land use planning shall be
limited to restrictions that are demonstrably necessary and narrowly tailored
to fulfill a compelling governmental interest that cannot be achieved through
less restrictive means.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) Actions that prevent or abate nuisances;
(2) The enforcement of the terms of a license, permit, or
authorization, including requirements imposed by federal law;
(3) An enforcement action by a governmental entity that is the
result of a final, nonappealable judicial determination; or
(4) A restrictive covenant entered into between private parties,
unless the implementation or adoption of the restrictive covenant was
required by a governmental entity.

18-11-905. Enforcement.
(a) An owner of private property that is subject to a property use
restriction in violation of § 18-11-904 may file an action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to challenge the property use restriction.
(b) The plaintiff shall prevail in an action filed under this section
unless the governmental entity demonstrates to the court that:
(1) The property use restriction is demonstrably necessary and
narrowly tailored to fulfill a compelling governmental interest;
(2) The property use restriction is the least restrictive means
to achieve the stated purpose of the restriction; and
(3) Reasonable alternatives could not achieve the stated
interest of the governmental entity.
(c) If a plaintiff prevails in an action under subsection (b) of this
section, the court shall permanently enjoin further enforcement of the
property use restriction and shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs
to the plaintiff.
(d) This section does not supersede or preempt an existing cause of
action that a person has under the United States Constitution, Arkansas
Constitution, a statute, or common law.
03/12/2025 12:59:56 PM ZRC082

HB1754

18-11-906. Statute of limitation.
The period prescribed for the commencement of an action under § 18-11-
905 is five (5) years from the date a person becomes aware of or reasonably
may have become aware of the cause of action having accrued.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability clause.
If any provision of this act or the application of this act to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this act
are declared severable.
























03/12/2025 12:59:56 PM ZRC082